Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0128.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) The Michigan-Ireland trade commission is created in the Michigan economic development corporation. (2) The commission consists of the following members, appointed by the governor: (a) One representative of a public institution of higher education in this state. (b) One representative of the chamber of commerce. (c) Three members who represent Irish-American communities or the interests of Irish-American communities. (d) One member from a list submitted by the senate majority leader that includes at least 2 individuals who meet either of the following criteria: (i) Have knowledge of or have current or past involvement in organizations that promote Irish affairs. (ii) Have interest in the well-being of trade relations between this state and Ireland. (e) One member from a list submitted by the senate minority leader that includes at least 2 individuals who meet either of the following criteria: (i) Have knowledge of or have current or past involvement in organizations that promote Irish affairs. (ii) Have interest in the well-being of trade relations between this state and Ireland. (f) One member from a list submitted by the speaker of the house of representatives that includes at least 2 individuals who meet either of the following criteria: (i) Have knowledge of or have current or past involvement in organizations that promote Irish affairs. (ii) Have interest in the well-being of trade relations between this state and Ireland. (g) One member from a list submitted by the house minority leader that includes at least 2 individuals who meet either of the following criteria: (i) Have knowledge of or have current or past involvement in organizations that promote Irish affairs. (ii) Have interest in the well-being of trade relations between this state and Ireland. (3) The governor shall appoint the first members of the commission not later than 90 days after the effective date of this act. (4) The term of a member of the commission is 2 years or until a successor is appointed under subsection (2), whichever is later. (5) If a vacancy occurs on the commission, the governor shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term. (6) The governor may remove a member of the commission for incompetence, dereliction of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, or any other good cause. (7) The governor shall call the first meeting of the commission. At the first meeting, the commission shall elect a member as a chairperson and may elect other officers that it considers necessary or appropriate. The commission shall meet at least quarterly, or more frequently at the call of the chairperson or at the request of 5 or more members. (8) A majority of the members of the commission constitute a quorum for transacting business. A vote in favor by a majority of the members of the commission serving is required for any action of the commission. (9) The commission shall conduct its business in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (10) A writing that is prepared, owned, used, possessed, or retained by the commission in performing an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (11) A member of the commission is not entitled to compensation for service on the commission, but the commission may reimburse a member for actual and necessary expenses incurred in serving. (12) The commission shall do all of the following: (a) Advance bilateral trade and investment between this state and Ireland. (b) Initiate joint action on policy issues of mutual interest to this state and Ireland. (c) Promote business and academic exchanges between this state and Ireland. (d) Encourage mutual economic support between this state and Ireland. (e) Encourage mutual investment in the infrastructure of this state and Ireland. (f) Address any other issues the commission determines. (13) The commission shall report any findings and results collected in the immediately previous year and recommendations to the governor and the legislature by February 1, 2027, and each February 1 thereafter. (14) The commission is authorized to raise funds, through direct solicitation or other fund-raising events, alone or with other groups, and accept gifts, grants, and bequests from individuals, corporations, foundations, governmental agencies, public and private organizations, and institutions, to minimize the commission's administrative expenses and to carry out its purposes as set forth in this act. The commission shall report on its publicly accessible website the receipt and details of any gifts, grants, or bequests described in this subsection. (15) The Michigan-Ireland trade commission fund is created in the state treasury. The state treasurer shall deposit funds, gifts, grants, and bequests received under subsection (14) in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. The department of treasury is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year does not lapse to the general fund. The department of treasury shall expend money from the fund on an annual basis upon appropriation only to minimize the commission's administrative expenses and to enable the commission to carry out its purposes as set forth in this act. (16) As used in this section: (a) "Commission" means the Michigan-Ireland trade commission created under subsection (1). (b) "Fund" means the Michigan-Ireland trade commission fund created in subsection (15).